Maine, session 132, LD2230.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §3241, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. D, §13, is
amended to read:
1. Program established; administration. The Housing Opportunity Program,
referred to in this section as "the program," is established within the Maine Office of
Community Affairs, established in section 3202 and referred to in this section as "the
office." The program must encourage and support the development of additional housing
units in the State, including industrialized housing, housing units that are affordable for
low-income and, moderate-income and middle-income individuals and housing units
targeted to community workforce housing needs. The office shall administer the program
and provide technical and financial assistance to support communities implementing
zoning and land use-related policies necessary to support increased housing development.
The program must support regional approaches and municipal model ordinance
development and encourage policies that support increased housing density, where
feasible, to protect working lands and natural lands. The program must provide housing
manufacturers, developers and the general public with information about housing needs
throughout the State and options available to meet those needs.
As used in this subsection, "industrialized housing" means a structure designed to be used
for residential housing consisting of or constructed using one or more modular buildings,
modular components or panelized systems that is designed and constructed in compliance
with standards established by the State and is in whole or substantial part fabricated or
assembled in manufacturing plants for installation, or assembly and installation, on a
separate building site and that has been manufactured in such a manner that all parts or
processes cannot be inspected at the installation site without disassembly of, damage to or
destruction of the structure.
Sec. 2. 5 MRSA §3241, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2025, c. 388, Pt. D, §13, is
amended by enacting at the end a new blocked paragraph to read:
The office shall adopt rules defining "low income," "moderate income" and "middle
income" for purposes of the program.
Sec. 3. 5 MRSA §13059-A is enacted to read:
§13059-A. Industrialized Housing Incentive Program; fund
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Fund" means the Industrialized Housing Incentive Program Fund established in
subsection 3.
B. "Industrialized housing" means a structure designed to be used for residential
housing consisting of or constructed using one or more modular buildings, modular
components or panelized systems that is designed and constructed in compliance with
standards established by the State and is in whole or substantial part fabricated or
assembled in manufacturing plants for installation, or assembly and installation, on a
separate building site and that has been manufactured in such a manner that all parts or
processes cannot be inspected at the installation site without disassembly of, damage
to or destruction of the structure.
Page 1 - 132LR3039(01)

2. Industrialized Housing Incentive Program established; administration. The
Industrialized Housing Incentive Program, referred to in this section as "the program," is
established within and administered by the department to provide grants or loans to
manufacturers of industrialized housing that meet the eligibility requirements of subsection
4.
3. Industrialized Housing Incentive Program Fund established; administration;
administrative expenses. The Industrialized Housing Incentive Program Fund is
established within and administered by the department as a revolving, nonlapsing, interest-
bearing fund to provide funds for the program. The fund may receive funds from
appropriations and allocations for the fund, bond proceeds and interest from investment of
bond funds, gifts, donations and other money from public and private sources. The fund
may be used by the department for its reasonable expenses administering the program and
the fund.
4. Eligibility. To be eligible for a grant or loan under this section, a person must own
or operate:
A. A manufacturing facility in the State that manufactures industrialized housing; or
B. A business in the State that manufactures housing in a manner determined by the
department to be innovative, such as housing that uses insulated concrete forms, kit
homes installed on a permanent foundation or 3-dimensional printed housing, which is
a housing unit constructed using a digital file in a process in which construction
material is deposited, joined or solidified under computer control, with the construction
material being added together typically layer by layer.
5. Grants or loans. The department may award a grant or loan to a person eligible
under subsection 4 in an amount not less than $1,500 and not more than $6,000 per housing
unit manufactured by the person and installed in the State, except that the department may
give a grant or loan in a higher amount for a housing unit that is affordable and energy
efficient. The department may award more than one grant or loan to an eligible person
under this section.
6. Rules. The department may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 4. Construction extension partnership program. The Department of
Economic and Community Development shall, by January 1, 2027, design and begin
implementing a public-private construction extension partnership program.
1. The purpose of the construction extension partnership program includes, but is not
limited to:
A. Facilitating the adoption and certification of industrialized housing construction,
such as cover panel building envelopes, volumetric modular construction, crossover
modern home construction and manufactured housing modalities;
B. Providing technical support to builders of industrialized housing;
C. Using industry knowledge to inform curriculum at Maine's community colleges and
career and technical education schools;
Page 2 - 132LR3039(01)

D. Collecting data on construction costs and speed of industrialized housing
construction; and
E. Supporting apprenticeships and other workforce programs.
2. The department shall design the construction extension partnership program in
consultation with representatives of the following:
A. Maine's public and private institutions of higher education, including community
colleges and career and technical education schools;
B. The Department of Labor;
C. The Department of Education;
D. The Maine Office of Community Affairs;
E. The Maine State Chamber of Commerce;
F. An organization representing general contractors;
G. A community development organization;
H. An organization representing architects designing residential housing;
I. An organization representing home builders and remodelers; and
J. An organization representing building supply companies.
By January 15, 2027, the Department of Economic and Community Development shall
submit a report to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
housing matters with details on the proposed design of the construction extension
partnership program and any recommended legislation needed to support the construction
extension partnership program. The committee may report out legislation related to the
report to the 133rd Legislature in 2027.
Sec. 5. Competitive innovative housing construction pilot program. By
January 1, 2027, the Department of Economic and Community Development shall establish
and administer a pilot program to promote the efficient construction of multifamily housing
units. The pilot program must include a competitive process that provides financial awards
upon the completion of an innovative housing project of 2 or more dwelling units in the
State. Criteria used to determine awards must include, but are not limited to, the cost to
construct the housing project, the time needed to complete the project and the level of
innovation demonstrated by the project. By January 1, 2028, the department shall submit
a report on the pilot program to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having
jurisdiction over housing matters. The committee may report out legislation related to the
report to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature.
Sec. 6. Maine Office of Community Affairs to adopt rules. By January 1,
2027, the Maine Office of Community Affairs shall adopt rules pursuant to the Maine
Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 3241, subsection 4.